Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB268.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 442.1 of the act of June 13, 1967 (P.L.31, No.21), known as the Human Services Code, is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 442.1. The Medically Needy; Determination of Eligibility.--* * *(d) No later than ninety days after eligibility for medical assistance is determined under this section, a person determined to be eligible for services under a home- and community-based waiver shall be offered those benefits.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.1234567891011121314151617